Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-710
Order; appeal.

Any order that is not intended as interlocutory or temporary under sections 30-701 to 30-713 shall be a final, appealable order. Such order may be appealed to the Court of Appeals in the same manner as an appeal from the district court directly to the Court of Appeals. The Court of Appeals shall conduct its review in an expedited manner and shall render its judgment and write its opinion, if any, as speedily as possible. The court may modify an existing order granting such visitation upon a showing that there has been a material change in circumstances which justifies such modification and that the modification would serve the best interests of the resident.

Laws 2018, LB845, § 10.